Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HMONG ZEJ ZOG.new text end new text begin $300,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $300,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to Hmong Zej Zog to preserve Hmong Minnesotans' heritage, history, language, and culture. new text end